New York, session 2025-2026, A5374.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 19.47 to read as follows: 3 § 19.47 Wound care kit and xylazine test strip distribution program. 4 1. The commissioner shall establish a program whereby individuals with 5 a substance use disorder or who are otherwise at risk of drug use may 6 receive, free of charge, wound care kits specifically designed for the 7 treatment of injection-related wounds and skin and soft tissue 8 infections, and xylazine test strips to detect the presence of xylazine. 9 The following facilities may apply to distribute such wound care kits 10 and xylazine test strips: 11 (a) hospital emergency rooms; 12 (b) addiction treatment facilities; 13 (c) facilities for substance use disorder programs; 14 (d) homeless shelters; 15 (e) urgent care centers; 16 (f) mobile health units; 17 (g) public health offices; 18 (h) safe syringe programs; and 19 (i) any other setting, as determined by the department, which is 20 routinely accessed by individuals with a substance use disorder or who 21 are otherwise at risk of drug use, and who are in need of treatment for 22 injection-related wounds and skin and soft tissue infections, or who 23 would benefit from the use of xylazine test strips. 24 2. Facilities distributing wound care kits and xylazine test strips 25 pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall not record any EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08166-01-5 A. 5374 2 1 personally identifying information regarding to whom such wound care 2 kits and xylazine test strips are distributed. 3 3. The commissioner, in cooperation with the commissioner of health, 4 shall develop and conduct a public awareness and educational campaign on 5 the importance of proper wound care and testing for the presence of 6 xylazine for individuals with a substance use disorder or who are other- 7 wise at risk of drug use. Such campaign shall detail how to properly use 8 the items in wound care kits designed for the treatment of injection-re- 9 lated wounds and skin and soft tissue infections, how to properly use 10 xylazine test strips, and the availability of free wound care kits and 11 xylazine test strips made available pursuant to subdivision one of this 12 section. 13 4. The provisions of this section shall not replace the duty of any 14 facility listed under subdivision one of this section to provide acute 15 wound care that would otherwise be provided by such facility. 16 5. (a) No police officer as defined by section 1.20 of the criminal 17 procedure law, peace officer as defined by section 2.10 of the criminal 18 procedure law, or police agency as defined by section eight hundred 19 thirty-five of the executive law, shall subject any facility listed 20 under subdivision one of this section, or any individual, to surveil- 21 lance, investigation, or prosecution for distributing or receiving wound 22 care kits or xylazine test strips pursuant to this section. 23 (b) Receipt or possession by an individual of a wound care kit or 24 xylazine test strip under the program established pursuant to subdivi- 25 sion one of this section shall not constitute reasonable cause to 26 believe that such individual has committed an offense or crime suffi- 27 cient to authorize arrest under section 140.10 of the criminal procedure 28 law, and shall not be the basis of any search or seizure of such indi- 29 vidual or such individual's property. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 31 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 32 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 33 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 34 completed on or before such effective date.